Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5946.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16148. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or section 17060, the department, in consultation with a board, may promulgate rules to establish standards for the education and training of individuals to be licensed or registered, or whose licenses or registrations are to be renewed, for the purposes of determining whether graduates of a training program have the knowledge and skills requisite for practice of a health profession or use of a title. By 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, the The department shall promulgate rules to include training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking required for individuals licensed or registered under this article, except those licensed under part 188 or subject to section 17060 or 17965. The training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking shall apply for a license or registration renewal beginning with the first renewal cycle after the rules are promulgated and for an initial license or registration issued 5 or more years after the rules are promulgated. (2) Except as otherwise provided in section 17060 and subject to subsections (6) and (7), only a board may accredit training programs in hospitals, schools, colleges, universities, and institutions offering training programs meeting educational standards and may deny or withdraw accreditation of training programs for failure to meet established standards. The board shall give a hospital, school, college, university, or institution that has its program accreditation withdrawn an opportunity for a hearing. (3) The board shall take action or make a decision under subsection (1) or (2) relating to a specific health profession subfield only after consultation with the task force in the affected health profession subfield and with at least 1 of the affected health profession subfield board members present. (4) A member of a licensing board from the health profession subfield shall vote as an equal member in all matters except those issues designated in subsections (1) and (2) that are outside the health profession subfield. (5) A decision of a board on standards for the education and training of individuals or the accreditation of a training program under subsection (1) or (2) must be concurred in by a majority of the board members who are not health profession subfield licensees if the decision relates solely to licenses that are not health profession subfield licenses. (6) The requirement of subsection subrule (2)(b)(iii) of former R 338.10305 of the Michigan administrative code, Administrative Code, that each member of the nursing faculty in a program of nursing education for registered nurses who provides instruction in the clinical laboratory or cooperating agencies hold a baccalaureate degree in nursing science does not apply to a member of the nursing faculty described in this subsection who meets both of the following requirements: (a) Was employed by or under contract to a program of nursing education on or before September 1, 1989. (b) Is employed by or under contract to a program of nursing education on June 29, 1995. (7) The requirement of subsection subrule (2)(c)(ii) of former R 338.10305 of the Michigan administrative code, Administrative Code, that each member of the nursing faculty in a program of nursing education for licensed practical nurses hold a baccalaureate degree in nursing science does not apply to a member of the nursing faculty described in this subsection who meets both of the following requirements: (a) Was employed by or under contract to a program of nursing education on or before September 1, 1989. (b) Is employed by or under contract to a program of nursing education on June 29, 1995. Sec. 17965. (1) Subject to section 16204, the board shall, by rule, require as a condition of license renewal of a license the furnishing of evidence of at least 18 hours, or the equivalent acceptable to the board, of continuing education for each 3-year license cycle. The courses shall must be approved by the board and shall include subjects related to the practice of massage therapy. (2) The board shall promulgate rules ensuring that continuing education activities acceptable to the board under subsection (1) include training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking that a licensee must complete as a condition of license renewal. The training standards described in this subsection apply for each license renewal beginning with the first renewal cycle after the rules are promulgated. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01099'25) or House Bill No. 5947 (request no. H01099'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.